Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3304
Board; determination of domicile.

The board shall, by majority vote, determine the domicile of the decedent at the time of his death. This determination shall be final for purposes of imposing and collecting death taxes but for no other purpose.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 4.